Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.020

Approval by capitol committee when real estate located in Thurston county.

The acquisition of real estate, and use thereof, shall be subject to the approval of the state capitol committee when the real estate is located in Thurston county.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.82.020. Prior: 1961 c 184 s 2; 1959 c 255 s 2.]